Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 1 General Provisions

53-7-60.
Jurisdiction.

The superior court shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the probate court over the settlement of accounts of personal representatives.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-61.
Filing of petition upon termination of personal representative.

If the personal representative resigns, is removed, or dies, an heir of an intestate estate or a beneficiary of a testate estate, the sureties of the personal representative or other personal representatives, or the successor personal representative may petition for an accounting and settlement. In the event a petition is filed for such accounting and settlement, the probate court shall retain jurisdiction over the personal representative until such accounting and settlement is completed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-62.
Appearance before court; failure of personal representative to appear; right to appeal.

Any person interested as an heir or beneficiary of an estate or the probate court may, after the expiration of six months from the granting of letters, cite the personal representative to appear before the probate court for a settlement of accounts. Alternatively, if the personal representative chooses, the personal representative may cite all the heirs or beneficiaries and all persons who claim to be creditors whose claims the personal representative disputes or cannot pay in full to be present at the settlement of the personal representative’s accounts by the court. The settlement shall be conclusive upon the personal representative and upon all the heirs or beneficiaries and all remaining persons who claim to be creditors who receive service of notice of the settlement proceeding in the probate court and the hearing in the manner provided by subsection (b) of this Code section or by Chapter 11 of this title. The court may, in the court’s discretion, give the personal representative additional time to settle the estate.

If the personal representative fails or refuses to appear as cited, the probate court may proceed without the appearance of the personal representative. If the personal representative has been required to give bond, the surety on such bond shall be bound by the settlement if the surety is served with notice by personal service of the settlement proceeding in the probate court. If one or more unsuccessful attempts at service are made by the sheriff or the sheriff’s deputies upon the personal representative at the last address of the personal representative in the court records and it appears to the probate court that further attempts are likely to be futile, then service of notice shall be sufficient upon the personal representative for purposes of this Code section if the citation is mailed by first-class mail to such address.

Any party to the settlement shall have the right to appeal.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-62

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1316, § 5; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-48/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “service of notice of the settlement proceeding in the probate court and the hearing in the manner provided by subsection (b) of this Code section or by Chapter 11 of this title” for “notice of the hearing” at the end of the third sentence in subsection (a); and, in subsection (b), substituted “served with notice” for “given notice” in the second sentence, and, in the third sentence, substituted “service of notice shall be sufficient upon the personal representative” for “service shall be sufficient upon the personal administrator”.

53-7-63.
Making and enforcing final settlement.

Upon proof of issuance of citation and service of notice pursuant to Code Section 53-7-62, the probate court may proceed to make an account, hear evidence upon any contested question, and make a final settlement between the personal representative and the heirs or beneficiaries. The settlement may be enforced by a judgment, writ of fieri facias, execution, or attachment for contempt.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-63

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-49/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “issuance of citation and service of notice” for “citation” in the first sentence of this Code section.

53-7-64.
Accounting for income on property administered.

A personal representative shall account for income on the property administered as follows:

The personal representative shall be charged with all income earned during the period of one year after the date of qualification;

For the period beginning one year after the date of qualification, the personal representative shall account for income as follows:

All income earned on property the personal representative is:

Authorized by the laws of this state to hold or invest in without securing the approval of any court to do so;

Authorized by any court to hold or invest in; or

Authorized by will to hold or invest in; and

On all other property administered by the personal representative and, except as provided in paragraph (3) of this Code section, the personal representative shall be charged with the greater of the income earned on such property or the income it would have earned if invested at the legal rate of interest fixed by the laws of this state and in effect during the time the property was held. In applying this subparagraph, each item of property shall be treated separately, and income in excess of the legal rate of interest earned on one item may not be used to make up any deficiency in the income earned on another item; and

The personal representative shall be charged only with interest actually earned, if any, on funds held in a reasonable sum to pay anticipated expenses.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-64

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-65.
Recordation of final receipts; admission in evidence.

The final receipts on settlements given by heirs or beneficiaries to a personal representative, whether a judicial or an informal settlement, may be admitted to record by the clerk of the probate court or the clerk of the superior court in either the county of residence of the personal representative or the county in which the estate is administered if attested by a judge of any court of this state, a magistrate, or a notary public. When recorded, the receipts shall be admitted in evidence without further proof. In case of loss of the original, a copy may be used in evidence under the same rules as for admission of copies of registered deeds.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-65

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-7-66.
Refunding bonds.

When litigation against the estate is pending or is threatened or when notice of a claim has been given to the personal representative, the personal representative may demand that the heirs or beneficiaries give refunding bonds to indemnify the personal representative against the claims. Upon the failure of the heirs or beneficiaries to give such bonds, the personal representative may reserve enough of the assets to respond to the claims.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-7-66

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.